pt-BR: Material de revestimento: Algodão corespun; Poliéster misto corespun; Algodão; Mistura de Kevlar; Nylon; Poliéster; Seda; Superpoly; Outro
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำโครงยาง: ผ้าฝ้ายปั่นแกน; โพลีเบลนด์ปั่นแกน; ผ้าฝ้าย; Kevlar ผสม; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ผ้าไหม; ซูเปอร์โพลี; อื่นๆ
en: Casing material: Corespun Cotton; Corespun Polyblend; Cotton; Kevlar Blend; Nylon; Polyester; Silk; Superpoly; Other
de: Karkassenmaterial: Corespun-Baumwolle; Corespun-Polyblend; Baumwolle; Kevlar-Mischung; Nylon; Polyester; Seide; Superpoly; Sonstige
ko: 케이싱 소재: 코어스펀 면; 코어스펀 폴리블렌드; 면; Kevlar 혼방; 나일론; 폴리에스터; 실크; 수퍼폴리; 기타
sk-SK: Materiál puzdra: Corespun bavlna; Corespun zmes polyesteru; Bavlna; Zmes kevlaru; Nylón; Polyester; Hodváb; Superpoly; Iné
es: Material del estuche: Algodón corespun; Mezcla de poliéster corespun; Algodón; Mezcla de Kevlar; Nailon; Poliéster; Seda; Superpoly; Otro
ru: Материал корпуса: Армированный хлопок; Армированная смесовая ткань; Хлопок; Смесь Kevlar; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Шелк; Суперполи; Другое
it: Materiale del rivestimento: Cotone corespun; Misto poliestere corespun; Cotone; Misto Kevlar; Nylon; Poliestere; Seta; Superpoly; Altro
cs: Materiál pouzdra: Corespun bavlna; Corespun směs polyesteru; Bavlna; Směs materiálu Kevlar; Nylon; Polyester; Hedvábí; Superpoly; Jiné
nl: Materiaal bandenkas: Corespun katoen; Corespun polyblend; Katoen; Kevlar-mix; Nylon; Polyester; Zijde; Superpoly; Overige
tr: Karkas malzemesi: Özlü pamuk; Özlü polikarışım; Pamuk; Kevlar karışımı; Naylon; Polyester; İpek; Süper poli; Diğer
fi: Kotelon materiaali: Ydinkehrätty puuvilla; Ydinkehrätty polysekoite; Puuvilla; Kevlar-sekoite; Nailon; Polyesteri; Silkki; Superpoly; Muu
bg-BG: Материал на каркаса на гумата: Памук corespun; Полиестерна смес corespun; Памук; Смес с Kevlar; Найлон; Полиестер; Коприна; Superpoly; Друго
fr: Matériau du boîtier: Coton corespun; Polyblend corespun; Coton; Mélange de Kevlar; Nylon; Polyester; Soie; Superpoly; Autre
ja: ケース素材: コアスパンコットン; コアスパンポリブレンド; コットン; Kevlarブレンド; ナイロン; ポリエステル; シルク; スーパーポリ; その他
pl: Materiał obudowy: Bawełna Corespun; Polimieszanka Corespun; Bawełna; Mieszanka z włóknem Kevlar; Nylon; Poliester; Jedwab; Superpoly; Inne
da: Husmateriale: Corespun bomuld; Corespun poly-blanding; Bomuld; Kevlar-blanding; Nylon; Polyester; Silke; Superpoly; Andet
el: Υλικό περιβλήματος: Βαμβάκι corespun; Πολυεστερικό μείγμα corespun; Βαμβάκι; Μείγμα Kevlar; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Μετάξι; Superpoly; Άλλο
zh-TW: 胎體材質: 包芯棉; 包芯聚酯混紡; 棉; Kevlar 混紡; 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 絲綢; 超級聚酯; 其他
hu: Bélelőanyag: Magfonatú pamut; Magfonatú poliészter keverék; Pamut; Kevlar keverék; Nejlon; Poliészter; Selyem; Superpoly; Egyéb
lt-LT: Karkaso medžiaga: Medvilnė su šerdimi; Poliesterio mišinys su šerdimi; Medvilnė; Kevlar mišinys; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Šilkas; „Superpoly“; Kita
hr-HR: Materijal kućišta: Pamučna pređa s jezgrom; Mješavina poliestera s jezgrom; Pamuk; Mješavina s Kevlarom; Najlon; Poliester; Svila; Superpoly; Ostalo
vi: Vật liệu vỏ lốp: Cotton corespun; Polyblend corespun; Cotton; Hỗn hợp Kevlar; Nylon; Polyester; Lụa; Superpoly; Khác
ro-RO: Materialul carcasei: Bumbac corespun; Amestec poli/corespun; Bumbac; Amestec Kevlar; Nailon; Poliester; Mătase; Superpoly; Altele
zh-CN: 外壳材质: 包芯棉; 包芯聚酯混纺; 棉; Kevlar 混纺; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 丝绸; 超级聚酯纤维; 其他
nb: Materiale i innfatning: Kjernespunnet bomull; Kjernespunnet polyblanding; Bomull; Kevlar-blanding; Nylon; Polyester; Silke; Superpoly; Annet
sv: Skalmaterial: Kärnspunnen bomull; Kärnspunnen polyblend; Bomull; Kevlar-blandning; Nylon; Polyester; Silke; Superpoly; Annat
pt-PT: Material da carcaça: Algodão com alma; Mistura de poliéster com alma; Algodão; Mistura de Kevlar; Nylon; Poliéster; Seda; Superpoly; Outro
sl-SI: Material ohišja: Corespun bombaž; Corespun mešanica s poliestrom; Bombaž; Mešanica z materialom Kevlar; Najlon; Poliester; Svila; Superpoly; Drugo